incubator/apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="vra/h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hů</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hovi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hům</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hovi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zích</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hem</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="srač/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kou</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kách</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kou</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/ůl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ůl</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oly</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olu</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olů</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olu</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olům</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ůl</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oly</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oly</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olech</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olem</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oly</l>
          <r>ůl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="v__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Determiners -->
    <pardef n="co__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čeho</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemu</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čim</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čem</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="co__det_ind">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bez"><i>bez</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="během"><i>během</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>do</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="díky"><i>díky</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="k"><i>k</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kolem"><i>kolem</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="krom"><i>krom</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kvůli"><i>kvůli</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mezi"><i>mezi</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mimo"><i>mimo</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="místo"><i>místo</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nad"><i>nad</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="naproti"><i>naproti</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="od"><i>od</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="okolo"><i>okolo</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oproti"><i>oproti</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pod"><i>pod</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="podle"><i>podle</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="podél"><i>podél</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pomocí"><i>pomocí</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pro"><i>pro</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pronásledovateli"><i>pronásledovateli</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prostřednictvím"><i>prostřednictvím</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="proti"><i>proti</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="před"><i>před</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="při"><i>při</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="s"><i>s</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skrz"><i>skrz</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="stran"><i>stran</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="v"><i>v</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vedle"><i>vedle</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vyjma"><i>vyjma</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="z"><i>z</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="za"><i>za</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="co"><i></i><par n="co__det"/></e>
    <e lm="co"><i></i><par n="co__det_ind"/></e>
    <e lm="vrah"><i>vra</i><par n="vra/h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sračka"><i>srač</i><par n="srač/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stůl"><i>st</i><par n="st/ůl__n"/></e>
